Missouri, session 2026, HB2185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.700, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 166.700, to read as follows:
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a particular content area or grade
level, including any supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section 160.011;
(3) "Early childhood center", any of the following that provides early childhood
education services:
(a) A licensed entity that meets the definition of a child care provider under
section 210.201;
(b) A license-exempt entity as described in section 210.211; or
(c) An entity that is unlicensed but is contracted with the state department of
elementary and secondary education;
(4) "Early childhood education services", the same definition as in section
161.244;
(5) "Educational assistance organization", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
[(4)] (6) "Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully present in the United States or
any person who gained illegal entry into the United States;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2185 2
[(5)] (7) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
[(6)] (8) "Private school", a school that is not a part of the public school system of the
state of Missouri and that charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary
educational services;
[(7)] (9) "Program", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
[(8)] (10) "Qualified school", an FPE school or any of the following entities that is
incorporated in Missouri and that does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or national
origin:
(a) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
(b) A private school;
(c) A public school as defined in section 160.011; [or]
(d) A public or private virtual school; or
(e) An early childhood center;
[(9)] (11) "Qualified student", any of the following:
(a) A child enrolled in an early childhood center; or
(b) An elementary or secondary school student who is a resident of this state, who is
not an illegal alien, and who:
[(a)] a. Has an approved "individualized education [plan] program" (IEP) developed
under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400
et seq., as amended; or
[(b)] b. Is a member of a household whose total annual income does not exceed an
amount equal to three hundred percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and
reduced price lunches, and that meets at least one of the following qualifications:
[a.] (i) Attended a public school as a full-time student for at least one semester during
the previous twelve months;
[b.] (ii) Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or first grade under sections
160.051 to 160.055; or
[c.] (iii) Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a scholarship grant in the
previous school year and will receive a scholarship grant in the current school year.
✔